Hawaii statutes.
§96-13 Publication of recommendations.
After a reasonable time has elapsed, the ombudsman may present the ombudsman's
opinion and recommendations to the governor, the legislature, the public, or
any of these. The ombudsman shall include with this opinion any reply made by
the agency. [L 1967, c 306, §14; HRS §96-13; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next